Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.090

Appeal from decree.

The decree rendered under RCW 11.106.070 shall be a final order from which any party in interest may appeal as in civil actions to the supreme court or the court of appeals of the state of Washington.

[ 1985 c 30 s 103. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 136; 1971 c 81 s 80; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.090; prior: 1951 c 226 s 9. Formerly RCW 30.30.090.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Method of appellate review superseded by RAP 2.2(a)(3), 18.22.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.